Wyoming, session 2026, HB0143.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-125 and 35-34-101 through
35-34-103 are created to read:
HB0143

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0356

1-39-125. Liability; free speech for health care
providers.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 35-34-101 through 35-34-103.

CHAPTER 34
FREE SPEECH FOR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS ACT

35-34-101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Free
Speech for Health Care Providers Act."

35-34-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Discrimination" means one (1) or more of
the following actions taken by a state agency against a
health care provider:

HB0143

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0356
(A) An adverse action, including but not
limited to:

(I) A denial, revocation or suspension
of a license or certification;

(II) A reprimand that results in
disciplinary action against the health care provider;

(III) A reduction in rank or pay;

(IV) Loss of privileges;

(V) Termination of employment.

(B) The communication of a threat of
adverse action.

(ii) "Health care provider" means any person who
participates in the delivery of a health care service,
including:

(A) Physicians and physician assistants;
HB0143

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0356

(B) Advanced practice registered nurses,
registered nurses and licensed practical nurses;

(C) Hospital, clinic or nursing home
employees;

(D) Pharmacists, pharmacy technicians and
other pharmacy employees;

(E) Medical school, nursing school,
psychology and counseling school faculty and students;

(F) Mental health professionals, including
but not limited to psychologists, psychiatrists and mental
health counselors;

(G) Social workers;

(H) Physical therapists;

(J) Any other person who participates in
the delivery of a health care service.
HB0143

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0356

(iii) "Health care service" means medical
research and health care provided to any person at any time
over the course of treatment, including:

(A) Medical testing, diagnosis, prognosis
and referrals;

(B) The prescribing, dispensing or
administering of any medication or medical device;

(C) Mental health therapy or counseling;

(D) Physical therapy;

(E) Record making and record keeping;

(F) Note taking related to medical
treatment;

(G) The preparation for or performance of a
surgery or other medical procedure;

HB0143

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0356
(H) Any other medical care, research or
service provided by a health care provider.

(iv) "State agency" means any state agency,
department, board or commission;

(v) "This act" means W.S. 35-34-101 through
35-34-103.

35-34-103. Free speech protected from state
discrimination; notice of speech-based complaints; civil
remedies.

(a) No state agency shall discriminate against a
health care provider for engaging in speech, expression or
association that occurs within the scope of providing
health care services or medical advice and that is
protected from government interference by the first
amendment to the United States constitution and article 1,
sections 20 and 21 of the Wyoming constitution, unless the
state agency demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence
that the health care provider's speech, expression or
association was the direct and proximate cause of physical
HB0143

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0356
or mental harm to a patient with whom the health care
provider had a provider-patient relationship within the
previous three (3) years.

(b) After determining that a health care provider has
been discriminated against by a board, commission or agency
for engaging in speech, expression or association that is
protected from government interference by the first
amendment to the United States constitution and article 1,
sections 20 and 21 of the Wyoming constitution within the
previous three (3) years, no state agency shall contract
with or require a person to obtain a license or
certification from that board, commission or agency,
provided that such speech, expression or association did
not constitute medical advice to a specific patient.

(c) Not later than fourteen (14) days after receipt
of the complaint or action, any applicable state agency
shall provide a health care provider with notice of any
complaint or action to suspend or revoke the health care
provider's license or certification due to the health care
provider's engaging in speech, expression or association
under the first amendment to the United States constitution
HB0143

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0356
and article 1, sections 20 and 21 of the Wyoming
constitution. Each state agency that fails to provide
notice under this subsection shall be subject to a fine of
five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each week that the
notice is not provided to the health care provider.

(d) A health care provider may bring a civil action
against a state agency for damages, injunctive relief or
both in a court of competent jurisdiction for any alleged
violations of this act. In a proceeding to enforce any of
the provisions of this act, a court may award reasonable
costs to the affected health care provider, including
attorney's fees.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0143